Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 212.5 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Auditor and Inspector shall have discretionary


authority to initiate performance audits, operational audits,

Req. No. 3110 Page 1


forensic audits, or special investigative audits of any state


agency, board, commission, or local government entity. Such audits


may be initiated based on:


1. Risk assessments;


2. Credible allegations of waste, fraud, abuse, or


inefficiency; or


3. The State Auditor and Inspector’s independent determination.


B. The audits provided for in subsection A of this section may


be initiated by the State Auditor and Inspector without requiring


the prior request of the Governor, the Attorney General, an agency


director, a district attorney, or a legislative resolution.


C. The State Auditor and Inspector shall have the authority to


issue administrative subpoenas to any public entity, officer,


employee, contractor, or third party receiving or managing public


funds for:


1. Documents;


2. Records;


3. Testimony under oath;


4. Electronic data; and


5. Physical evidence.


D. Any person who does not comply with an administrative


subpoena issued by the State Auditor and Inspector under the


provisions of subsection A of this section shall, upon conviction,


be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not more than One

Req. No. 3110 Page 2


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment in the custody of


the Department of Corrections for not more than thirty (30) days, or


by both such fine and imprisonment.


E. The State Auditor and Inspector is authorized to conduct


audits or inspections without prior announcement.


F. The State Auditor and Inspector is authorized to secure


premises or records on a temporary basis when deemed necessary by


the State Auditor and Inspector to preserve evidence of potential


wrongdoing.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 212.6 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Auditor and Inspector shall, within thirty (30)


days of the finalization of an audit, refer all audit findings that


indicate potential criminal violations, fraud, embezzlement, or


misappropriation of public funds to the Attorney General and the


district attorney for the county where such violations occurred.


B. The Attorney General shall review such referral from the


State Auditor and Inspector and shall:


1. Initiate investigation or prosecution where probable cause


exists; or


2. Electronically submit a written explanation to the State


Auditor and Inspector and the Legislature for any decision to not


proceed with such investigation or prosecution.

Req. No. 3110 Page 3


C. The Attorney General shall annually submit a report to the


Legislature and the State Auditor and Inspector by electronic


submission on the status and outcomes of all referrals received from


the State Auditor and Inspector, including:


1. Actions taken;


2. Cases prosecuted;


3. Recoveries achieved; and


4. The written explanations provided for in paragraph 2 of


subsection B of this section.


D. Any audit that provides serious findings of waste, fraud, or


abuse shall be automatically transmitted by the State Auditor and


Inspector to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of


the House of Representatives, and the chairs of the legislative


committee relating to the audited entity. Additionally, unless


confidentiality is required for an ongoing criminal investigation,


the contents of such audit shall be released for public viewing.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 212.7 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any entity audited by the State Auditor and Inspector shall


submit a corrective action plan to the State Auditor and Inspector


within sixty (60) days after receiving an audit report with adverse


findings.



Req. No. 3110 Page 4


B. The State Auditor and Inspector shall monitor the


implementation of the corrective action plan and report


noncompliance with such plan to the Attorney General and the


Legislature. An entity reported to be in noncompliance by the State


Auditor and Inspector may be subject to sanctions, including but not


limited to the withholding of state funds.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 212.8 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby established within the Office of the State


Auditor and Inspector the Investigative Division.


B. The Division shall:


1. Be staffed with certified fraud examiners and investigators;


and


2. Support expanded forensic and special audits.


C. The State Auditor and Inspector shall promulgate rules to


effectuate the provisions of this section.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 212.9 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Office of the State Auditor and Inspector is authorized to


recover costs from audited entities for expenses related to special


or investigate audits.



Req. No. 3110 Page 5


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


There is hereby appropriated to the State Auditor and Inspector


from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue


Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,


One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00) for the


purposes of supporting enhanced staffing and operations as provided


for in this act.


SECTION 7. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 8. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3110 MSBB 1/14/2026 5:55:43 PM



















Req. No. 3110 Page 6